src/fst/phonology.twolc
! =================================== !
!! # The Northern Haida morphophonological/twolc rules file 
! =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-hdn/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabet
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å   !!= * @CODE@ 
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç ' ʼ . %-  !!= * @CODE@ 
 g̲ k̲ x̲  !!= * @CODE@ 

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å  !!= * @CODE@ 
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð  !!= * @CODE@ 
 G̲ K̲ X̲  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %  ! this is a space
 %>:0 	!!= * @CODE@ affix boundary
 %^WS:0    !!= * @CODE@ white space dummy
 %^DEF:0    !!= * @CODE@ white space dummy
 %^ENDA:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDB:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDC:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDD:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDE:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDF:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDG:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 %^ENDH:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 s2:s  !!= * @CODE@ 
 ú2:ú  !!= * @CODE@ 
 á2:á  !!= * @CODE@ 
 é2:é  !!= * @CODE@ 
 í2:í  !!= * @CODE@ 
 ú2:ú  !!= * @CODE@ 

;

!! ## Sets

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å  !!= * @CODE@
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã  ; !!= @CODE@
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ' ʼ ç ý ñ ; !!= * @CODE@
 Orth = . %- ;     !!= * @CODE@ 
 Endings = %^DEF %^ENDA  %^ENDB  %^ENDC  %^ENDD  %^ENDE  %^ENDF  %^ENDG  %^ENDH ;    !!= * @CODE@ 
 Sgm = Vow Cns Orth   ; !!= * @CODE@

 
Definitions 

 WS = :* %^WS:0  :* ;   !!= * @CODE@ 
 AccVow =  [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ]  ;     !!= * @CODE@ 
   
!! ## Rules

Rules

!! ### ahl rules

"ahl to ál, ahl to áal"
!! **@RULENAME@** ahl changes to ál at the end of a stem verb when it is followed by an ending belonging to Set B, F, G or H

a:á <=> \AccVow Cns Cns _ h:0 l %>: [ %^ENDB:0 | %^ENDF:0 | %^ENDG:0 | %^ENDH:0 | %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ;

"ahl to ál, ahl to áal"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
!h:0 <=> a: _ l %>: [%^ENDB:0 | %^ENDF:0 | %^ENDG:0 | %^ENDH:0 ] ;
!        a: 0: _ l %>: [ %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ;
!        _ l %>: %^DEF:0 ;

h:0 <=>  á: a  _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ g | á: a | %. á: ]  ; ! skyáalga 
         Cns a  _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ g |  á: a | á: n g | %. á: ]  ; !  áljalga
         Cns a 0:a _ l  %>: (Endings:) [ ' a | á: a  ]  ; !  áljalga 


"ahl to áal, part 2"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
0:a <=> a: _ h: l %>: [ %^ENDD:0 | %^ENDE:0 ] ; !

"s2 to j for DEF"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
s2:j <=> _ Sgm:* %>: %^DEF:0 ; 

"aa to a for DEF"
!! **@RULENAME@** 
a:0 <=> a _ Cns: %>: %^DEF:0 ; 
 
 
!! ### Destressing

"Destressing rule"
!! **@RULENAME@** - The rule removes accents from vowels. This should be a general rule, but we have problems of getting the variables to accept 0:Vow
Vx:Vy <=> [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:*  %>:  (Endings:) Sgm:* _  ;
          [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:* Vow: 0:Vow  Cns:+  %>:  (Endings:) Sgm:* _  ; 
          [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ] Sgm:* _ Sgm:* [ %>: | .#. ] ; !kúníida
 	where Vx in ( á é í ó ú )
 	      Vy in ( a e i o u )
 	      matched ;



!"g deletion on the suffix border"
!g:0 <=> _ %>: g ;

!sdlaagwaal:sdlaagulaay
